Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Chapter 16

Tennessee Investment Services Act of 2007

Compiler's Notes. The 2013 Restated Comments to Official Text reflect the input of various groups as well as the comments provided by the Uniform Law Commission.

35-16-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Investment Services Act of 2007.”

Acts 2007, ch. 144, § 1.

35-16-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Claim” means a right to payment, whether or not the right is reduced to judgment, liquidated, unliquidated, fixed, contingent, matured, unmatured, disputed, undisputed, legal, equitable, secured or unsecured;

“Creditor” means, with respect to a transferor, a person who has a claim;

“Debt” means liability on a claim;

“Disposition” means a transfer, conveyance or assignment of property, including a change in the legal ownership of property occurring upon the substitution of one (1) trustee for another or the addition of one (1) or more new trustees. “Disposition” also includes the exercise of a power so as to cause a transfer of property to a trustee or trustees, but shall not include the release or relinquishment of an interest in property that, until the release or relinquishment, was the subject of a qualified disposition;

“Investment advisor” means a person given authority by the terms of an investment services trust to direct, consent to or disapprove a transferor's actual or proposed investment decisions, distribution decisions or other decisions of the transferor;

“Investment decision” means the retention, purchase, sale, exchange, tender or other transaction affecting the ownership of or rights in investments;

“Investment services trust” means an instrument appointing a qualified trustee or qualified trustees for the property that is the subject of a disposition, which instrument:

Expressly incorporates the law of this state to govern the validity, construction and administration of the trust;

Is irrevocable; and

Provides that the interest of the transferor or other beneficiary in the trust property or the income from the trust property may not be transferred, assigned, pledged or mortgaged, whether voluntarily or involuntarily, before the qualified trustee or qualified trustees actually distribute the property or income from the property to the beneficiary;

“Person” has the meaning ascribed to it in § 1-3-105;

“Property” includes real property, personal property, and interests in real or personal property;

“Qualified affidavit” means a sworn affidavit signed by the transferor before a disposition of assets to an investment services trust that meets the requirements of § 35-16-103. In the event of a disposition by a transferor who is a trustee, the affidavit shall be signed by the transferor who made the original disposition to the trustee, or a predecessor trustee, in a form that meets the requirements of subdivisions (7)(B) and (C) and shall state facts as of the time of the original disposition;

“Qualified disposition” means a disposition by or from a transferor with or without consideration, to an investment services trust after the transferor executes a qualified affidavit;

“Qualified trustee” means a person who:

In the case of a natural person, is a resident of this state, or, in all other cases, is authorized by the law of this state to act as a trustee and whose activities are subject to supervision by the Tennessee department of financial institutions, the federal deposit insurance corporation, the comptroller of the currency, or the office of thrift supervision or any successor to them;

Maintains or arranges for custody in this state of some or all of the property that is the subject of the qualified disposition, maintains records for the investment services trust on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis, prepares or arranges for the preparation of required income tax returns for the investment services trust, or otherwise materially participates in the administration of the investment services trust; and

Is not the transferor;

“Spouse” or “former spouse” means only persons to whom the transferor was legally married at, or before, the time the qualified disposition is made;

“Transferor” means a person who, directly or indirectly, makes a disposition or causes a disposition to be made in such person's capacity:

As an owner of property;

As a holder of a power of appointment that authorizes the holder to appoint in favor of the holder, the holder's creditors, the holder's estate or the creditors of the holder's estate; or

As a trustee; and

Unless the context or a provision contained in this chapter provides otherwise, throughout this chapter, any form of the word “trustee,” whether singular or plural means “trustee, cotrustee or any other fiduciary” as fiduciary is defined at § 35-15-103 relative to any power or duty held by such fiduciary that could otherwise be held by a trustee, to the extent that such fiduciary is holding such a power or duty and is not an excluded fiduciary as defined at § 35-15-103 relative to that power or duty.

Acts 2007, ch. 144, § 2; 2008, ch. 1010, § 1; 2010, ch. 725, § 13; 2013, ch. 390, § 44.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and (5) An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

1. Bankruptcy.

Living trust for which debtor served as trustee was not valid and enforceable Tennessee Asset Protection Trust (TAPT) such that its assets were excluded from bankruptcy estate because, while debtor held beneficial interest in trust during his lifetime, trust satisfied none of remaining requirements for valid TAPT, at least with respect to present lifetime trust. In re Erskine, 550 B.R. 362, 2016 Bankr. LEXIS 1169 (Bankr. W.D. Tenn. Apr. 8, 2016).

Section Comment.

“Claim” refers to any legal right to a payment, irrespective of the manner in which the right is acquired.

“Creditor” means any person who has a claim against a Transferor.

“Debt” means liability on a claim.

“Disposition” refers to any transfer of property. A change of Trustees is a disposition. However, a change of Trustees of an Investment Services Trust after a Qualified Disposition was previously made does not require the execution of a new Qualified Affidavit to maintain the creditor protection provided by the previous Qualified Disposition. Exercising a general power of appointment to transfer property to a trust benefitting the person exercising the power is also a disposition.

“Investment advisor” includes persons given authority to veto or approve investment decisions or distribution decisions.

“Investment decision” means any decision affecting the ownership of or rights in investments owned by an Investment Services Trust.

In order to be eligible as an “Investment Services Trust,” the trust agreement must be irrevocable, must appoint at least one Qualified Trustee, must incorporate Tennessee law to govern the validity, construction and administration of the trust, and must contain a “spendthrift” provision prohibiting the Transferor or any beneficiary from transferring, assigning, pledging or mortgaging their interest in the trust.

“Person” includes natural persons as well as entities. Entities are allowed to establish an Investment Services Trust.

“Property” includes all types of property, real and personal.

Requiring the Transferor to execute a “Qualified Affidavit” prior to making a transfer of property to an Investment Services Trust reinforces the notion that fraudulent conveyances will not be effective to avoid creditors. The required statements for the affidavit to be qualified are set forth in T.C.A. § 35-16-103.

In order to take advantage of the creditor protection provided by an Investment Services Trust, the Transferor must make a “Qualified Disposition” to the Trust. In order to be a Qualified Disposition, the Transferor must execute a Qualified Affidavit prior to making a transfer to the trust.

The definition of “Qualified Trustee” has both identity and activity components. The Trustee must be either an individual resident of Tennessee or a bank or trust company that is authorized by federal or Tennessee law to serve as a Trustee of a Tennessee trust. The Qualified Trustee must perform at least one of these 4 activities: maintain custody of some trust property in Tennessee, maintain trust records, prepare or arrange for preparation of trust tax returns, or materially participate in the administration of the trust. The Transferor will not qualify as a Qualified Trustee and should not so serve since serving as a trustee is not one of the authorized powers that the Transferor is allowed to retain pursuant to T.C.A. § 35-16-111. Family members of the Transferor can meet the definition of a Qualified Trustee, though that may not the best choice. As long as the trust has at least one Qualified Trustee, there is no limit on the number of non-qualified co-trustees that may serve.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-16-103. Qualified affidavit requirements.

A qualified affidavit shall state that:

The transferor has full right, title, and authority to transfer the assets to the trust;

The transfer of the assets to the trust will not render the transferor insolvent;

The transferor does not intend to defraud a creditor by transferring the assets to the trust;

The transferor does not have any pending or threatened court actions against the transferor, except for those court actions identified by the transferor on an attachment to the affidavit;

The transferor is not involved in any administrative proceedings, except for those administrative proceedings identified on an attachment to the affidavit;

The transferor does not contemplate filing for relief under the federal bankruptcy code; and

The assets being transferred to the trust were not derived from unlawful activities.

Acts 2007, ch. 144, § 3.

35-16-104. Restrictions on actions, remedies and claims.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no action of any kind, including, but not limited to, an action to enforce a judgment entered by a court or other body having adjudicative authority, shall be brought at law or in equity for an attachment or other provisional remedy against property that is the subject of a qualified disposition to an investment services trust or for the avoidance of a qualified disposition to an investment services trust, unless the action is brought pursuant to the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act, compiled in title 66, chapter 3, part 3, and, in the case of a creditor whose claim arose after a qualified disposition, unless the qualified disposition was also made with actual intent to defraud such creditor.

Notwithstanding § 66-3-310, a creditor's claim under subsection (a) shall be extinguished:

If the person is a creditor when the qualified disposition to an investment services trust is made, unless the action is commenced within the later of two (2) years after the qualified disposition is made or six (6) months after the person discovers or reasonably should have discovered the qualified disposition; or

If the person becomes a creditor after the qualified disposition to an investment services trust is made, unless the action is commenced within two (2) years after the qualified disposition is made;

If subdivision (b)(1) applies:

A person shall be deemed to have discovered the existence of a qualified disposition to an investment services trust at the time any public record is made of any transfer of property relative to such qualified disposition, including but not limited to, the conveyance of real property that is recorded in the office of the county register of deeds of the county in which the property is located or the filing of a financing statement under title 47, chapter 9, or the equivalent recording or filing of either with the appropriate person or official under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this state; and

No creditor shall bring an action with respect to property that is the subject of a qualified disposition unless that creditor proves by clear and convincing evidence that the settlor's transfer of such property was made with the intent to defraud that specific creditor.

For purposes of this chapter, a qualified disposition that is made by means of a disposition by a transferor who is a trustee shall be deemed to have been made as of the time, whether before, on or after July 1, 2007, the property that is the subject of the qualified disposition was originally transferred to the transferor acting in the capacity of trustee, or any predecessor trustee, in a form that meets the requirements of § 35-16-102(7)(B) and (C).

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a creditor, including a creditor whose claim arose before or after a qualified disposition, or any other person shall have only the rights with respect to a qualified disposition that are provided in this section and § 35-16-106, and neither a creditor nor any other person shall have any claim or cause of action against the trustee, or an advisor of an investment services trust, or against any person involved in the counseling, drafting, preparation, execution or funding of an investment services trust. For purposes of this section, counseling, drafting, preparation, execution or funding of an investment services trust includes the counseling, drafting, preparation, execution and funding of a limited partnership or a limited liability company if interests in the limited partnership or limited liability company are subsequently transferred to the investment services trust.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no action of any kind, including, but not limited to, an action to enforce a judgment entered by a court or other body having adjudicative authority, shall be brought at law or in equity against a trustee or an advisor of an investment services trust, or against any person involved in the counseling, drafting, preparation, execution or funding of an investment services trust, if, as of the date such action is brought, an action by a creditor with respect to the investment services trust would be barred under this section.

In circumstances where more than one (1) qualified disposition is made by means of the same investment services trust, then:

The making of a subsequent qualified disposition shall be disregarded in determining whether a creditor's claim with respect to a prior qualified disposition is extinguished as provided in subsection (b); and

Any distribution to a beneficiary shall be deemed to have been made from the latest qualified disposition.

If, in any action brought against an investment services trust, a court takes any action whereby the court declines to apply the law of this state in determining the effect of a spendthrift provision of the trust, the trustee of the trust shall immediately upon the court's action and without the further order of any court, cease in all respects to be trustee of the trust and a successor trustee shall succeed as trustee in accordance with the terms of the trust or, if the trust does not provide for a successor trustee and the trust would otherwise be without a trustee, a court of this state, upon the application of any beneficiary of the trust, shall appoint a successor trustee upon the terms and conditions it determines to be consistent with the purposes of the trust and this chapter. Upon the trustee's ceasing to be trustee, the trustee shall have no power or authority other than to convey the trust property to the successor trustee named in the trust in accordance with this section.

An investment services trust shall be subject to this section whether or not the transferor retains any or all of the powers and rights described in § 35-16-111 or serves as an investment advisor pursuant to § 35-16-109.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) or (b) to the contrary, the limitations on actions by creditors in law or equity shall not apply and such creditors' claims shall not be extinguished if the transferor is indebted on account of an agreement, judgment or order of a court for the payment of one (1) of the following:

Past due child support;

Past due alimony in solido of a spouse or former spouse;

Past due alimony or support of a spouse or former spouse; or

A written agreement, judgment or order of a court for division of marital property of a spouse or former spouse, but only to the extent of such debt, legally mandated interest and the reasonable cost of collection.

A claim provided under this subsection (i) shall be asserted against a trustee only:

Upon a final non-appealable determination of a Tennessee court or a fully domesticated, final non-appealable order of a court of another state as defined by § 35-15-103 that such debt is past due; and

After the court has determined that the claimant has made reasonable attempts to collect the debt from any other sources of the transferor or that such attempts would be futile.

Nothing in this subdivision (i)(2) shall be construed to prohibit the court from making the findings required in subdivisions (i)(2)(A)(i) and (ii) in the same proceeding and order.

Subsection (i) shall not apply to any claim for forced heirship, legitime or elective share.

In addition to subsection (j), to the extent subsection (j) applies to the laws of any foreign country:

For all purposes under this chapter, the effect of the laws of any foreign country shall be the same as provided in § 35-15-107(b)(3) and (4); and

Subsection (a) applies in addition to all other provisions of this chapter.

Acts 2007, ch. 144, § 4; 2008, ch. 1010, § 2; 2010, ch. 725, §§ 14-16; 2013, ch. 390, §§ 45-47.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that: (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and (5) An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Attorney General Opinions. Creditors' claims under the Tennessee Investment Services Act of 2007. OAG 11-79, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 81 (11/17/11).

Section Comment.

Use of Terms T.C.A. § 35-15-505(a)(2) generally precludes an individual from transferring his or her assets to a trust as a shield against the settlor’s creditors. Investment Services Trusts are an exception to this general rule.

Subsection (a) specifies that creditors are generally restricted from reaching the assets held in an Investment Services Trust. With certain exceptions, no action of any kind, including enforcement of a judgment, may be brought to attach trust property. Creditors seeking to reach trust property are limited to only those actions available through the Tennessee Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act. Thus, if a transfer to an Investment Services Trust is found to be a fraudulent transfer, the assets can be reached.

Subdivision (b)(1) creates two separate statutes of limitations for creditors to bring claims against an Investment Services Trust or a Qualified Disposition of property to an Investment Services Trust. For claims arising before the date of a Qualified Disposition, the claim must be initiated within two years or, if later, within six months after the disposition was or could reasonably have been discovered by the creditor. If the claim arises at the same time or later than the disposition, the limitations period is two years.

A person shall be deemed to have discovered the existence of a Qualified Disposition when any public record is made regarding the transfer of property to the Investment Services Trust. The statute provides a non-exclusive list of types of public records, including a deed that is recorded in the register of deeds and the filing of a financing statement under the Tennessee Uniform Commercial Code.

Even if a creditor fits within the applicable statute of limitation, the creditor may not bring an action with respect to property that is the subject of a Qualified Disposition unless the creditor proves by clear and convincing evidence that the Transferor’s transfer was made with intent to defraud that specific creditor.

Subsection (c) contains a tacking rule which provides that the amount of time that trust assets are held in a predecessor trust may be added to the time the assets are considered held in the Investment Services Trust. This tacking provision could be important in cases involving dispositions that are otherwise still within the applicable limitations period but were generated by previous dispositions from another asset protection trust.

Notwithstanding other provisions of the law, there is a complete bar against actions brought by creditors against a Qualified Trustee or trust advisor. This bar extends to claims against persons who provide counseling, drafting, preparation, execution, or funding of the trust. The same limitations periods applicable for claims against trust assets apply to claims brought against the trustee or trust advisor.

When multiple Qualified Dispositions are made to an Investment Services Trust, each disposition is tested on its own to see whether it is protected from creditors. Distributions are deemed to be made from the latest Qualified Disposition to the Investment Services Trust.

A Trustee of an Investment Services Trust automatically ceases to serve if a court declines to apply Tennessee law in determining the validity, construction, or administration of such trust, or the effect of its spendthrift clause, in a proceeding involving such Trustee. If a trustee ceases to act, any successor trustee designated in the trust will take its place. The trust may have non-Tennessee co-trustees and advisors.

Two classes of creditors are exempted from the provisions protecting trust assets. Child support obligations and those stemming from alimony or spousal support are outside of the statute’s protections. Importantly, the statute defines “spouse” or “former spouse” as a person to whom the Transferor was married at or before the time of the qualified distribution. Thus, dispositions in trust made before the Transferor’s marriage are protected from spousal claims by the statute. Unlike some domestic asset protection trust statutes, tort claimants are not “exception creditors” in Tennessee.

In order for an “exception creditor” to reach assets in an Investment Services Trust, there must be final court order that a debt is due for child support, alimony, support, or division of marital property. The court must also determine that the claimant has made reasonable efforts to collect the debt or that such attempts would be futile.

Creditors may not reach assets of an Investment Services Trust for forced heirship, legitime or elective share.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-16-105. Powers and rights of transferor.

A transferor shall have only the powers and rights conferred by the investment services trust. The powers and rights conferred by the investment services trust upon the transferor are personal powers and rights that may not be exercised by a creditor or any other person, except as expressly permitted by the trust. Except as permitted by §§ 35-16-109 and 35-16-111, the transferor shall have no rights or authority with respect to the corpus of the investment services trust or the income from the trust, and any agreement or understanding purporting to grant or permit the retention of any greater rights or authority shall be void.

Acts 2007, ch. 144, § 5; 2010, ch. 725, § 17.

35-16-106. Avoidance of qualified dispositions.

A qualified disposition to an investment services trust shall be avoided only to the extent necessary to satisfy the transferor's debt to the creditor at whose instance the disposition had been avoided, together with costs, including attorneys' fees, that the court may allow.

In the event any qualified disposition shall be avoided as provided in subsection (a), then:

If the court is satisfied that a qualified trustee has not acted in bad faith in accepting or administering the property that is the subject of the qualified disposition:

The qualified trustee shall have a first and paramount lien against the property that is the subject of the qualified disposition in an amount equal to the entire cost, including attorneys' fees, properly incurred by the qualified trustee in the defense of the action or proceedings to avoid the qualified disposition;

The qualified disposition shall be avoided subject to the proper fees, costs, preexisting rights, claims and interests of the qualified trustee and of any predecessor qualified trustee that has not acted in bad faith; and

For purposes of this subdivision (b)(1), it shall be presumed that the qualified trustee did not act in bad faith merely by accepting the property; and

If the court is satisfied that a beneficiary of an investment services trust has not acted in bad faith, the avoidance of the qualified disposition shall be subject to the right of the beneficiary to retain any distribution made upon the exercise of a trust power or discretion vested in the qualified trustee or qualified trustees of the investment services trust, which power or discretion was properly exercised prior to the creditor's commencement of an action to avoid the qualified disposition. For purposes of this subdivision (b)(2), it shall be presumed that the beneficiary, including a beneficiary who is also a transferor of the trust, did not act in bad faith merely by creating the trust or by accepting a distribution made in accordance with the terms of the trust.

A disposition by a trustee that is not a qualified trustee to a trustee that is a qualified trustee shall not be treated as other than a qualified disposition solely because the trust instrument fails to meet the requirements of § 35-16-102(7)(A).

In the case of a disposition to more than one (1) trustee, a disposition that is otherwise a qualified disposition shall not be treated as other than a qualified disposition solely because not all of the recipient trustees are qualified trustees.

Acts 2007, ch. 144, § 6.

35-16-107. Spendthrift provisions.

A spendthrift provision as described in § 35-16-102(7)(C) shall be deemed to be a restriction on the transfer of the transferor's beneficial interest in the trust that is enforceable under applicable nonbankruptcy law within the meaning of § 541(c)(2) of the Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. § 541(c)(2)), or any successor provision.

Acts 2007, ch. 144, § 7.

35-16-108. Qualified trustees and advisors.

For purposes of this chapter, neither the transferor nor any other natural person who is a nonresident of this state nor an entity that is not authorized by the law of this state to act as a trustee or whose activities are not subject to supervision as provided in § 35-16-102(12)(A) shall be considered a qualified trustee; however, nothing in this chapter shall preclude a transferor from appointing one (1) or more advisors, including, but not limited to:

Advisors who have authority under the terms of the trust instrument to remove and appoint qualified trustees or trust advisors;

Advisors who have authority under the terms of the trust instrument to direct, consent to or disapprove distributions from the trust; and

Investment advisors, whether or not the advisors would meet the requirements imposed by § 35-16-102(12).

For purposes of subsection (a), “advisor” includes a trust “protector” or any other person who, in addition to a qualified trustee, holds one (1) or more trust powers.

Acts 2007, ch. 144, § 8.

35-16-109. Transferor as investment advisor.

A person may serve as an investment advisor notwithstanding that the person is the transferor of the qualified disposition.

Acts 2007, ch. 144, § 9; 2010, ch. 725, § 18.

35-16-110. Successor trustees.

In the event that a qualified trustee of an investment services trust ceases to meet the requirements of § 35-16-102(12)(A), and there remains no trustee that meets the requirements, the qualified trustee shall be deemed to have resigned as of the time of that cessation, and thereupon the successor qualified trustee provided for in the investment services trust shall become a qualified trustee of the investment services trust, or in the absence of any successor qualified trustee provided for in the investment services trust, then a court of this state shall, upon application of any interested party, appoint a successor qualified trustee.

Acts 2007, ch. 144, § 10.

35-16-111. Revocability of trusts.

An investment services trust shall not be deemed revocable on account of its inclusion of one (1) or more of the following:

A transferor's power to veto a distribution from the trust;

A power of appointment, other than a power to appoint to the transferor, the transferor's creditors, the transferor's estate or the creditors of the transferor's estate, either exercisable by written instrument of the transferor during the transferor's life or exercisable by will or other written instrument of the transferor effective upon the transferor's death;

The transferor's potential or actual receipt of income, including rights to the income retained in the trust;

The transferor's potential or actual receipt of income or principal from a charitable remainder unitrust or charitable remainder annuity trust as those terms are defined in § 664 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 664), and any successor provision;

The transferor's receipt each year of an amount specified in the trust, the amount not to exceed five percent (5%) of the initial value of the trust or its value determined from time to time pursuant to the trust;

The transferor's potential or actual receipt or use of principal if the potential or actual receipt or use of principal would be the result of a qualified trustee's or qualified trustees' acting:

In the qualified trustee's or qualified trustees' discretion. For purposes of this section, a qualified trustee is presumed to have discretion with respect to the distribution of principal unless the discretion is expressly denied to the trustee by the terms of the trust;

Pursuant to a standard that governs the distribution of principal and does not confer upon the transferor a power to consume, invade or appropriate property for the benefit of the transferor, unless the power of the transferor is limited by an ascertainable standard relating to the health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of § 2041(b)(1)(A) or § 2514(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 2041(b)(1)(A) or 26 U.S.C. § 2514(c)(1)), as in effect on July 1, 2007, or as later amended; or

At the direction of an advisor described in § 35-16-108 who is acting:

In the advisor's discretion; or

Pursuant to a standard that governs the distribution of principal and does not confer upon the transferor a power to consume, invade, or appropriate property for the benefit of the transferor, unless the power of the transferor is limited by an ascertainable standard relating to the health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of § 2041(b)(1)(A) or § 2514(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 2041(b)(1)(A) or 26 U.S.C. § 2514(c)(1)), as in effect on July 1, 2007, or as later amended;

The transferor's right to remove a trustee or advisor and to appoint a new trustee or advisor; provided, however, that the right shall not include the appointment of a person who is a related or subordinate party with respect to the transferor within the meaning of § 672(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, (26 U.S.C. § 672(c)), and any successor provision;

The transferor's potential or actual use of real property held under a qualified personal residence trust within the meaning of the term as described in § 2702(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 2702(c)), and any successor provision;

The transferor's potential or actual receipt of income or principal to pay, in whole or in part, income taxes due on income of the trust if such potential or actual receipt of income or principal is pursuant to a provision in the trust instrument that expressly permits a distribution to the transferor as reimbursement for such taxes and if such distribution would be the result of a qualified trustee's or qualified trustees' acting:

In such qualified trustee's or qualified trustees' discretion or pursuant to a mandatory direction in the trust instrument; or

At the direction of an adviser described in § 35-16-108, who is acting in such adviser's discretion;

The ability, whether pursuant to direction in the investment services trust or discretion of a qualified trustee to pay, after the death of the transferor, all or any part of the debts of the transferor outstanding at the time of the transferor's death, the expenses of administering the transferor's estate, or any estate or inheritance tax imposed on or with respect to the transferor's estate; and

A qualified trustee's or qualified trustees' authority to make distributions to pay taxes in lieu of or in addition to the power to make a distribution for taxes pursuant to subdivision (3), (6), (9), or (10) by direct payment to the taxing authorities.

Acts 2007, ch. 144, § 11; 2010, ch. 725, § 19; 2013, ch. 390, § 53.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 390, § 55 provided that:

Except as otherwise provided in the act, on July 1, 2013:

The act applies to all trusts created before, on, or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced on or after July 1, 2013;

The act applies to judicial proceedings concerning trusts commenced before July 1, 2013, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of the act would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceedings or prejudice the rights of the parties, in which case the particular provision of the act does not apply and the superseded law applies;

Any rule of construction or presumption provided in the act applies to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2013, unless there is a clear and express indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the trust; and

An act done before July 1, 2013, is not affected by the act.

Section Comment.

This section sets forth eleven additional rights that the Transferor may retain without endangering the qualification of the trust as an Investment Services Trust. The trust will not be deemed revocable (and thus lose its protective value) if the trust instrument provides that: (1) the Transferor retains a power to veto trust distributions; (2) the Transferor retains a special power of appointment over trust assets. In 2013, the power of appointment in subsection 2 was expanded from a testamentary power of appointment to a power that could also be exercised during the Transferor’s lifetime. The purpose for this change was to allow the creation of a trust that qualifies as a non-grantor trust for federal income tax purposes, yet is not a completed gift for federal gift tax purposes; (3) the Transferor receives trust income or has a right to retained trust income; (4) the Transferor retains a right to income or principal from a charitable remainder unitrust or charitable remainder annuity trust; (5) the Transferor receives annually either an annuity or unitrust interest not in excess of five percent (5%); (6) the Transferor receives trust principal through either the actions of the Qualified Trustee or advisor in his sole discretion or based on an ascertainable standard set forth in the trust instrument; (7) the Transferor retains the right to remove the Trustee and appoint a new one who is not related or subordinate to the Transferor, as such term is defined in Internal Revenue Code Section 672(c); (8) the Transferor uses real property held under a personal residence trust as a personal residence; (9) the Transferor receives trust income or principal to pay income taxes due on income of the trust through either the actions of the Qualified Trustee or advisor in his sole discretion or based on mandatory direction set forth in the trust instrument; (10) the Qualified Trustee uses trust assets to pay the Transferor’s debts outstanding at the time of the Transferor’s death including the expenses of administering the Transferor’s estate, or any estate or inheritance taxes imposed on the Transferor’s estate; or (11) the Qualified Trustee pays certain tax obligations of the Transferor or the Transferor’s estate. Thus, the Transferor can retain significant benefits and control while gaining protection from creditors for trust assets.

1. Bankruptcy.

Living trust for which debtor served as trustee was not valid and enforceable Tennessee Asset Protection Trust (TAPT) such that its assets were excluded from bankruptcy estate because debtor was not qualified trustee, which rendered trust not “investment services trust” for purposes of Tennessee law. In re Erskine, 550 B.R. 362, 2016 Bankr. LEXIS 1169 (Bankr. W.D. Tenn. Apr. 8, 2016).

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

35-16-112. Applicability.

This chapter applies to qualified dispositions to investment services trusts and dispositions by transferors who are trustees made on or after July 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, ch. 144, § 12.